District of Columbia statutes.
26-1319

Annual reports — Liability of directors or trustees.

If any company fails to comply with the provisions of § 26-1318, all the directors or trustees of such company shall be jointly and severally liable for the debts of the company then existing and for all that shall be contracted before such report shall be made; provided, that in case of failure of the company in any year to comply with the provisions of § 26-1318, and any of the directors shall, on or before January 15th of such year, file his written request for such compliance with the secretary of the company, the Superintendent of Banking and Financial Institutions [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking], and the Recorder of Deeds of the District of Columbia, such director shall be exempt from the liability prescribed in this section.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1307, ch. 854, § 731
Nov. 23, 1985, D.C. Law 6-63,§ 106(a)(13)
as added Apr. 11, 1986, D.C. Law 6-107, § 2(k), 33 DCR 1168
1981 Ed., § 26-419.
1973 Ed., § 26-319.